Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.2212

Washington professional educator standards board—Certificate renewal rules for teachers in STEM-related subjects.

The professional educator standards board shall revise certificate renewal rules for teachers at the elementary and secondary levels in STEM-related subjects by September 1, 2014. The revised rules shall include the requirement that continuing education or professional growth plans for these teachers include a specific focus on the integration of science, mathematics, technology, and engineering instruction.

[ 2011 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 3.]